Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.160

Promoting prostitution in the first degree, second degree—Court appearance—No-contact orders—Entry of order into computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

(1) A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or information with an offense involving promoting prostitution in the first degree as described in RCW 9A.88.070 or promoting prostitution in the second degree as described in RCW 9A.88.080 and not arrested shall appear in court for arraignment or initial appearance in person as soon as practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days after the defendant is served with the citation, complaint, or information. At that appearance, the court shall determine the necessity of imposing or extending a no-contact order, and consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800 or other conditions of pretrial release according to the procedures established by court rule for preliminary appearance or an arraignment.

(2) Whenever a no-contact order is issued under this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

[ 2017 c 230 s 5.]